en: Sheep butters
bg: Овче масло
fr: Beurres au lait de brebis
hr: Ovčji maslaci
pl: Masło owcze

en: Goat butters
bg: Козе масло
fr: Beurres au lait de chèvre
hr: Kozji maslaci
pl: Masło kozie

en: Butters, cow butters
bg: Краве масло
ca: Mantegues
cs: Máslo
da: Smør
de: Butter
es: Mantequillas
fi: voit
fr: Beurres, beurre
he: חמאות
hr: maslacima, maslac
hu: Vajak
it: Burro
ja: バター
lt: Sviestai
nl: Roomboters
pl: Masła, Masło
pt: Manteigas
ro: Unt
ru: масло сливочное, сливочное масло
sl: masla, maslo
sv: Smör
tr: Tereyağı

fr: Beurres de baratte
nl: Gekarnde boter, Karneboter

en: Light butter, Low-fat butter spread
bg: Масло с намалено съдържание на мазнини
de: fettarme Butter, Halbfettbutter
fi: Vähärasvainen voi, Kevyempi voi, Kevytvoi
fr: Beurres allégés, Beurre allegé, Beurre doux allégé léger, Beurre doux allégé à teneur reduite en matière grasse
hr: Svijetli maslac
lt: Neriebaus sviesto užtepėlė
nl: Light roomboters
pt: Manteiga magra

en: Half-salted butter
de: leicht gesalzene Butter
fi: puoliksi suolattu voi
fr: Beurres demi-sel, beurre demi-sel
hr: Poluslani maslac
it: Burro semi-salato
lt: Pusiau sūdyti sviestai
nl: Lichtgezouten roomboters
pt: Manteigas meio-sal

en: Lightly salted butter with 80% fat
fr: Beurres demi-sel à 80% MG
hr: Blago posoljeni maslac s 80% masti
lt: Lengvai sūdyti sviestai 80% riebumo

en: Lightly salted light butter with 60-62% fat
fr: Beurres demi-sel à 60-62% MG à teneur réduite en matière grasse
hr: Blago posoljeni svijetli maslac sa 60-62% masti
lt: Lengvai sūdyti sviestai 60-62% riebumo

en: sour cream butters, sour cream butter
de: Sauerrahmbutter
fr: Beurre de culture, beurre de crème acide
hr: Maslaci od kiselog vrhnja
lt: Grietinės sviestai, grietinės sviestas
ru: Масло кисло-сливочное, Масло кислосливочное, Кисло-сливочное масло, Кислосливочное масло

en: mildly soured butters, mildly soured butter
de: Mildgesäuerte Butter
fr: Beurres légèrement aigres
hr: Blago ukiseljene maslace
nl: Milde zure boter

en: sweet cream butters, sweet cream butter
de: Süßrahmbutter
fr: Beurres de crème douce
hr: Maslaci od slatkog vrhnja
ru: Масло сладко-сливочное, Масло сладкосливочное, Масло сливочное сладко-сливочное, Сладко-сливочное масло, Сладкосливочное масло

en: Unsalted butters
bg: Безсолно масло
de: Ungesalzene Butter
es: Mantequila sin sal
fi: suolattomat voit
fr: Beurres doux, beurre doux, beurres non salés, beurres sans sel
hr: Neslani maslaci
it: Burro non salato
ja: 食塩不使用バター
lt: Sviestai be druskos
nl: Ongezouten roomboters, Roomboters (ongezouten)
pt: Manteigas sem sal

en: Unsalted butter with 82% fat
bg: Безсолно масло с 82% масленост
fr: Beurre doux à 82% MG
hr: Neslani maslac sa 82% masti
lt: Sviestai be druskos 82% riebumo
pt: Manteigas sem sal com 82% de gordura

en: Easy-to-spread unsalted butter with 82% fat
fr: Beurre doux tendre à 82% MG

en: Light unsalted butter with 60-62% fat
fr: Beurre à 60-62% MG à teneur réduite en matière grasse doux

en: Unsalted light butter with 39-41% fat
fr: Beurre léger doux à 39-41% MG

en: Molded butters
de: Verpackte Butter, Geformte Butter
fr: Beurres moulés, Beurre moulé
hr: Lijevani maslaci
nl: Gemodelleerde roomboter

en: Pasteurized butters
bg: Пастьоризирано масло
de: Pasteurizierte Butter
es: Mantequilla pasteurizada
fi: Pastöroidut voit
fr: Beurres pasteurisés
hr: Pasterizirani maslaci
it: Burro pastorizzato
lt: Pasterizuoti sviestai
nl: Gepasteuriseerde roomboters

en: Salted butters, salted butter
de: Salzbutter, gesalzene Butter
es: Mantequilla con sal
fi: suolatut voit
fr: Beurres salés, beurre salé
hr: Slani maslaci
it: Burro salato
ja: 有塩バター
lt: Sviestai su druska
nl: Gezouten roomboters

en: Three-quarter-fat butter
de: Dreiviertelfettbutter